cs: Úroveň kontrolního roztoku: Dvojité balení (úrovně 1 a 3); Vysoký; Úroveň 0; Úroveň 1; Úroveň 2; Úroveň 3; Úroveň 4; Nízký; Střední; Normální; Jiné
da: Kontrolløsningsniveau: Dobbeltpakke (niveau 1 og 3); Høj; Niveau 0; Niveau 1; Niveau 2; Niveau 3; Niveau 4; Lav; Medium; Normalt; Andet
bg-BG: Ниво на контролен разтвор: Двоен пакет (нива 1 и 3); Висок; Ниво 0; Ниво 1; Ниво 2; Ниво 3; Ниво 4; Нисък; Средна; Нормална; Други
hu: Kontrolloldat szintje: Dupla csomag (1. és 3. szint); Magas; 0. szint; 1. szintű; 2. szintű; 3. szintű; 4. szintű; Alacsony; Közepes; Normál; Egyéb
vi: Mức độ dung dịch kiểm soát: Gói kép (Cấp 1 và 3); Cao; Cấp 0; Cấp độ 1; Cấp độ 2; Cấp độ 3; Cấp độ 4; Trễ; Vừa; Da thường; Khác
zh-CN: 控制溶液浓度: 双包装（1 级和 3 级）; 高; 0 级; 1 级; 2 级; 3 级; 4 级; 低; 中度; 普通; 其他
fi: Kontrolliliuoksen taso: Kaksoispakkaus (tasot 1 ja 3); Korkea; Taso 0; Taso 1; Taso 2; Taso 3; Taso 4; Matala; Keskimääräinen; Normaali; Muu
nl: Niveau controleoplossing: Dubbel pakket (niveau 1 en 3); Hoog; Niveau 0; Niveau 1; Niveau 2; Niveau 3; Niveau 4; Laag; Medium; Normaal; Andere
it: Livello della soluzione di controllo: Confezione doppia (livelli 1 e 3); Alto; Livello 0; Livello 1; Livello 2; Livello 3; Livello 4; Basso; Medio; Normale; Altro
ro-RO: Nivel soluție de control: Pachet dublu (nivelurile 1 și 3); Înaltă; Nivelul 0; Nivelul 1; Nivelul 2; Nivelul 3; Nivelul 4; Joasă; Medie; Normal; Altele
en: Control solution level: Dual Pack (Levels 1 & 3); High; Level 0; Level 1; Level 2; Level 3; Level 4; Low; Medium; Normal; Other
hr-HR: Razina kontrolne otopine: Dvostruko pakiranje (razine 1 i 3); Visoki; Razina 0; Razina 1; Razina 2; Razina 3; Razina 4; Niski; Polusuho; Normalna; Ostalo
ja: コントロール溶液レベル: デュアルパック（レベル1＆3）; 高; レベル0; レベル1; レベル2; レベル3; レベル4; 低; 中挽き; 普通; その他
fr: Concentration de la solution de contrôle: Pack double (niveaux 1 et 3); Haute; Niveau 0; Niveau 1; Niveau 2; Niveau 3; Niveau 4; Basse; Moyen; Normale; Autre
th: ระดับสารละลายควบคุม: แพ็คคู่ (ระดับ 1 และ 3); เอวสูง; ระดับ 0; ระดับ 1; ระดับ 2; ระดับ 3; ระดับ 4; ต่ำ; ปานกลาง; ผิวปกติ; อื่นๆ
el: Επίπεδο διαλύματος ελέγχου: Διπλή συσκευασία (επίπεδα 1 & 3); Υψηλή; Επίπεδο 0; Επιπέδου 1; Επιπέδου 2; Επιπέδου 3; Επιπέδου 4; Χαμηλή; Μέση; Κανονικός; Άλλο
lt-LT: Kontrolinio tirpalo lygis: Dvigubas paketas (1 ir 3 lygiai); Aukštas; 0 lygis; 1 lygis; 2 lygis; 3 lygis; 4 lygis; Žemas; Vidutinis; Normali; Kita
pt-BR: Nível da solução de controle: Pacote duplo (níveis 1 e 3); Alta; Nível 0; Nível 1; Nível 2; Nível 3; Nível 4; Baixa; Médio; Normal; Outro
pt-PT: Nível da solução de controlo: Pack duplo (níveis 1 e 3); Alto; Nível 0; Nível 1; Nível 2; Nível 3; Nível 4; Baixo; Moagem média; Normal; Outro
es: Nivel de solución de control: Paquete doble (niveles 1 y 3); Alto; Nivel 0; Nivel 1; Nivel 2; Nivel 3; Nivel 4; Bajo; Medio; Normal; Otros
ko: 대조 용액 수준: 듀얼 팩 (레벨 1 및 3); 높음; 레벨 0; 1단계; 2단계; 3단계; 4단계; 낮음; 중간; 일반; 기타
sl-SI: Stopnja kontrolne raztopine: Dvojno pakiranje (nivoja 1 in 3); Visoka; Nivo 0; 1. stopnja; 2. stopnja; 3. stopnja; 4. stopnja; Nizek; Medij; Normalna; Drugo
sv: Kontrollösningsnivå: Dubbelförpackning (nivå 1 och 3); Hög; Nivå 0; Nivå 1; Nivå 2; Nivå 3; Nivå 4; Låg; Medium; Normalt; Övrigt
nb: Kontrollløsningsnivå: Dobbelpakke (nivå 1 og 3); Høy; Nivå 0; Nivå 1; Nivå 2; Nivå 3; Nivå 4; Lav; Middels; Normal; Annet
sk-SK: Úroveň kontrolného roztoku: Dvojité balenie (úroveň 1 a 3); Vysoký; Úroveň 0; Úroveň 1; Úroveň 2; Úroveň 3; Úroveň 4; Nízky; Stredný; Normálny; Iné
de: Kontrolllösungsniveau: Doppelpack (Stufe 1 & 3); Hoch; Stufe 0; Stufe 1; Stufe 2; Stufe 3; Stufe 4; Niedrig; Mittel; Normal; Sonstiges
pl: Poziom w roztworze kontrolnym: Podwójny zestaw (poziomy 1 i 3); Wysoki; Poziom 0; Poziom 1; Poziom 2; Poziom 3; Poziom 4; Niski; Średni; Normalny; Inne
ru: Уровень контрольного раствора: Двойной набор (уровни 1 и 3); Высокие; Уровень 0; Уровень 1; Уровень 2; Уровень 3; Уровень 4; Низкие; Средний; Нормальная; Другой
zh-TW: 對照溶液濃度: 雙包裝（第 1 和第 3 級）; 高; 第 0 級; 1 級; 2 級; 3 級; 4 級; 低; 中等; 中性; 其他
tr: Kontrol solüsyonu seviyesi: Çift paket (seviye 1 ve 3); Yüksek; Seviye 0; Seviye; Seviye; Seviye; Seviye; Düşük; Orta; Normal; Diğer